Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.0411, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Maternal mental health program required. new text end new text begin (a) A health plan must include a maternal mental health program. new text end new text begin (b) The maternal mental health program must: new text end new text begin (1) ensure comprehensive and effective care for pregnant and postpartum individuals; new text end new text begin (2) require at least one maternal mental health screening to be conducted during pregnancy, at least one additional screening to be conducted during the first six weeks of the postpartum period, and additional postpartum screenings, if determined to be medically necessary and clinically appropriate in the judgment of the treating provider; new text end new text begin (3) reimburse health care professionals for all services provided under this subdivision, including but not limited to conducting screenings, diagnosing conditions, and coordinating treatment, in an amount that equals at least the provider's cost to perform the service; and new text end new text begin (4) provide health care professionals with resources and referrals to trained perinatal mental health providers, including but not limited to behavioral health specialists and support networks, as needed to ensure timely and effective care. new text end new text begin (c) A health plan is prohibited from intentionally or unreasonably delaying a referral to a qualified behavioral health care professional when the referral is clinically indicated. Clinical indication includes but is not limited to a positive result on a test for a mental health condition administered by a health care professional or an enrollee reporting suicidal ideation during the perinatal period. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to all policies, plans, certificates, and contracts offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0671, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Maternal mental health program. new text end new text begin (a) Medical assistance must include and cover a maternal mental health program, as described in section 62A.0411. new text end new text begin (b) Medical assistance must meet the requirements that would otherwise apply to a health plan under section 62A.0411, except that medical assistance is not required to comply with any provision of section 62A.0411 if compliance with the provision would: new text end new text begin (1) prevent the state from receiving federal financial participation for the coverage under this subdivision; or new text end new text begin (2) result in a lower level of coverage or reduced access to coverage for medical assistance enrollees. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Medical assistance. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for medical assistance coverage of a maternal mental health program under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0671, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin MinnesotaCare. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the health care access fund to the commissioner of human services for MinnesotaCare coverage of a maternal mental health program under Minnesota Statutes, section 256L.03, subdivision 1, and as set forth in Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0671, subdivision 14. new text end